Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.190

Review of increased density bonus for affordable housing located on property owned by a religious organization.

The joint committee must review the efficacy of the increased density bonus incentive for affordable housing development located on property owned by a religious organization pursuant to chapter 218, Laws of 2019 and report its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2030. The review must include a recommendation on whether this incentive should be continued without change or should be amended or repealed.

[ 2019 c 218 s 4.]